Idaho, session 2026, H0847.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Judicial Branch the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and ex-
pense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. COURT OPERATIONS:
A. SUPREME COURT:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,635,900 $1,295,500 $225,600 $18,157,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 271,000 271,000
Federal Grant
Fund 440,100 1,419,300 0 1,859,400
TOTAL $17,076,000 $2,985,800 $225,600 $20,287,400
B. COURT OF APPEALS:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,756,700 $43,900 $2,800,600
C. DISTRICT COURTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $24,165,200 $1,102,800 $25,268,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Court Technology
Fund 5,751,300 $3,348,300 9,099,600
DrugCourt, MentalHealthCourtandFamilyCourtServices
Fund 1,930,400 3,368,500 0 5,298,900
TOTAL $26,095,600 $10,222,600 $3,348,300 $39,666,500
D. MAGISTRATE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $23,094,100 $382,800 $23,476,900
DrugCourt, MentalHealthCourtandFamilyCourtServices
Fund 1,278,600 1,890,700 3,169,300
Guardianship Pilot Project
Fund 371,600 66,200 437,800
Senior Magistrate Judges
Fund 600,000 600,000
Federal Grant
Fund 21,000 90,100 111,100
TOTAL $24,765,300 $3,029,800 $27,795,100
E. WATER ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $757,500 $161,900 $919,400
F. COMMUNITY-BASED SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Substance Abuse Treatment
Fund $264,200 $434,200 $4,230,800 $4,929,200
G. SENIOR JUDGES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,181,900 $1,181,900
DIVISIONTOTAL $72,897,200 $16,878,200 $3,348,300 $4,456,400 $97,580,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. GUARDIAN AD LITEM PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,700 $2,750,800 $2,767,500
III. JUDICIAL COUNCIL:
FROM:
General
Fund $22,500 $132,500 $155,000
GRANDTOTAL $72,936,400 $17,010,700 $3,348,300 $7,207,200 $100,502,600
SECTION 2. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS. The Judicial Branch is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section
67-3511(1), (2), and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between
expense classes and between programs for all moneys appropriated to it for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations
shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly ap-
proved by the Legislature.
SECTION 3. RETIREMENT CONTRIBUTIONS. Of the amount appropriated in
Section 1 of this act from the General Fund for the state's share of retire-
ment contribution remittances to the Judges' Retirement Fund for justices'
and judges' retirement benefits pursuant to Section 1-2004(2), Idaho Code,
those amounts that are uncommitted shall be transferred monthly into op-
erating expenditures and then paid by the Judicial Branch into the Judges'
Retirement Fund.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Judicial Branch any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropri-
ated or reappropriated to the Judicial Branch from the American Rescue Plan
Act (ARPA) State Fiscal Recovery Fund for fiscal year 2026, in an amount not
to exceed $16,222,200 from the American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA) State Fiscal
Recovery Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.


SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.